Vermont, session 2025-2026, H217.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as the “Vermont Clean Air Preservation Act.”
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. chapter 23A is added to read:
CHAPTER 23A. GEOENGINEERING
§ 587. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Atmospheric activity” means any polluting experiment or
intervention conducted by any person, artificial intelligence, or any
combination thereof, that occurs in the atmosphere and may have harmful
consequences upon health, the environment, or agriculture.
(2) “Chaff” means aluminum-coated silica glass fibers typically
dispersed in bundles containing 5,000,000 to 100,000,000 inhalable fibers,
which fall to the ground in about one day, or for nano-chaff, years, and then
fall and break apart. Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS),
known also as “forever chemicals,” are an ingredient in chaff.
(3) “Cloud seeding” is a type of weather engineering or experimentation
that may change the amount or type of precipitation by dispersing chemicals or
chemical compounds such as dry ice (CO2), silver iodide (AgI), or Tri-methyl
aluminum (TMA) into the atmosphere by means of aircraft or ground
generators.
VT LEG #379707 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.217
2025 Page 3 of 8
(4) “Entity” means any of the following: individual; trust; firm; joint
stock company; corporation, including a quasigovernmental corporation;
nongovernmental organization; public or private partnership; association;
syndicate; municipality or municipal agency; program; fire district; club;
nonprofit agency; commission; university; college or academic institution;
State department or agency; the federal government or any interstate or
international governance or instrumentality thereof, including foreign,
domestic, and mercenary armed services or region within the United States;
and artificial intelligence.
(5) “Geoengineering” means the intentional large-scale alteration or
manipulation of the environment involving the release of aerosols, chemicals,
chemical compounds, electromagnetic radiation, or other physical agents that
increase air pollution and effect changes to the earth’s atmosphere or surface,
inclusive of solar radiation modification, sunlight reflection methods,
stratospheric aerosol injection (SAI), cirrus cloud thinning (CCT), marine
cloud brightening (MCB), or cloud seeding.
(6) “Hazard” means a process, substance, or physical agent that by its
nature is harmful to living organisms generally or to property or another
interest of value.
(7) “Intervention” means the act of interfering with weather processes or
altering atmospheric or environmental conditions or releasing pollutants by
VT LEG #379707 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.217
2025 Page 4 of 8
methods including SRM, SAI, MCB, CCT, weather modification, cloud
seeding, or outdoor pollution dispersion modeling.
(8) “Physical agent” means an agent, other than a substance, including
radiofrequency/microwave (RF/MW) and other electromagnetic radiation and
fields, barometric pressure, temperature, gravity, kinetic or de facto weaponry,
mechanical vibration, and sound.
(9) “Pollutant” means any aerosol; biologic; biologic or genetically
modified agent; perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) known
also as “forever chemicals”; chaff; substance, including smoke, vapor, soot,
fumes, acid, alkalis, chemicals, chemical compounds, and smart dust;
artificially produced electric fields; magnetic fields, electromagnetic fields,
electromagnetic pulse (EMP), sound waves, sound pollution, light pollution,
and microwaves; and all artificially produced ionizing or nonionizing radiation
or waste.
(10) “Pollution” means the discharge, dispersal, deposition, injection,
release, seepage, migration, or escape of pollutants.
(11) “Release” means any activity that results in the issuance of
pollutants such as the emitting, transmitting, discharging, or injecting of one or
more nuclear; biological; biological, chemical, or physical agents into the
ambient atmosphere, whether once, intermittently, or continuously.
VT LEG #379707 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.217
2025 Page 5 of 8
(12) “Solar radiation modification,” “sunlight reflection methods,” or
“SRM” means an experiment in the earth’s climatic system involving the
release of pollutants that reduces the amount of sunlight reaching the earth’s
surface. Scientific dimensions of SRM include the use of interoperable
ground-based, airborne, and space-based facilities.
(13) “State Guard” means the entity established pursuant to 20 V.S.A.
chapter 61.
(14) “Weather engineering” means the deliberate manipulation or
alteration of the environment for the purpose of changing the weather or
climate by artificial means, through interventions involving the release of
pollutants into the atmosphere via cloud seeding for small-scale, large-scale,
and global-scale alteration of the environment.
(15) “Weather modification” means changing, controlling, or interfering
with or attempting to change, control, or interfere with the natural development
of cloud forms, precipitation, barometric pressure, temperature, conductivity,
or other electromagnetic or sonic characteristics of the atmosphere.
§ 588. PROHIBITION ON GEOENGINEERING
(a) No person or entity shall engage in solar radiation modification (SRM)
or any polluting atmospheric intervention in Vermont, including using an
aircraft, a balloon, a space-based platform, a ground generator, or an
interoperable ground-based facility.
VT LEG #379707 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.217
2025 Page 6 of 8
(b) The Vermont State Police or a sheriff shall immediately issue a cease-
and-desist order when an unlawful polluting atmospheric intervention is
suspected. The cease-and-desist order under this section shall have the weight
of a court order and any violation shall be punished in accordance with section
589a of this chapter.
(c) Government and armed forces projects shall meet all the requirements
of this chapter. If an activity deemed a hazard pursuant to this chapter has
been approved, explicitly or implicitly, by the federal government, the State
Police or a sheriff shall issue a notice to the appropriate federal agency that the
activity cannot lawfully be carried out within or over the State of Vermont.
(d) This chapter shall be implemented by the State Police and sheriffs, who
shall determine whether violations have occurred and, if deemed necessary,
shall refer potentially prohibited activity to the Vermont Air National Guard or
State Guard. The State Police and the Vermont Air National Guard shall
develop a policy to determine the process for referring violations to the
National Guard and what the enforcement procedure is.
§ 589. COMMUNICATIONS INFRASTRUCTURE
(a) Communications facilities shall be subject to evaluation by an
independent licensed radiofrequency (RF) engineer paid for by the facility
owner because SRM includes the use of interoperable ground-based, airborne,
and space-based facilities and heightened radiation levels.
VT LEG #379707 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.217
2025 Page 7 of 8
(b) The RF engineer shall provide findings in a report to be submitted to
the local sheriff. The radiation signal strength metered at the reported location
is not to exceed -75 dBm (decibel-milliwatt) for any frequency or channel band
specified by a transmitting entity’s FCC transmission license; or, maximum
power output limit from all frequencies or antennas from a wireless facility is
not to exceed 0.1 watt of effective radiated power (ERP) so as to provide -75
dBm signal strength at one-half mile, or five bars on a cell phone. If signal
strength metered by the RF engineer is in excess of -75 dBm, the facility
operator has 30 days to achieve compliance without disruption to performance
of Vermonters’ personal wireless services. The State Police shall perform
random testing from time to time to ensure facility compliance with this
chapter. Failure to comply will result in a fine of not more than $50,000.00 per
day for each day the facility is out of compliance. Deliberate falsification or
altering of information related to this section shall constitute a violation of this
chapter. All public and private entities operating in the state shall comply with
the requirements of this section.
§ 589a. PENALTIES AND ENFORCEMENT
(a) An entity or individual who engages in a polluting atmospheric
intervention or who uses an unmarked or unidentified aircraft or other vehicle
or facility to carry out SRM, SAI, geoengineering, weather modification,
cloud-seeding, or any other polluting atmospheric intervention:
VT LEG #379707 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.217
2025 Page 8 of 8
(1) has committed a felony and shall pay a fine of not more than
$50,000.00 or be imprisoned for not more than two years, or both;
(2) shall be guilty of a separate offense for each day during which
violative activity has been conducted, repeated, or continued; and
(3) shall be subject to the penalties of any other applicable pollution
laws.
(b) Each sheriff shall deputize and train one or more Vermont citizens to
help enforce the provisions of this chapter. The State Police, sheriff, or a
deputized Vermont citizen shall investigate reports of SRM, polluting
atmospheric interventions, or radiation to ensure compliance with the
requirements of this chapter.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379707 v.3